Connecticut, session 2026, SB00437.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Labor Commissioner shall study
positions that minors who are sixteen and seventeen years of age are
currently prohibited from being employed (1) under state or federal law,
and (2) under state law, but not federal law. Not later than January 1,
2027, the commissioner shall submit the results of such study along with
any recommendations for legislation, in accordance with the provisions
of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor
and public employees.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
LCO No. 2755 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 437